Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,254
Legislative intent.

The Legislature finds and declares that protection of the environment is enhanced by the public's voluntary compliance with environmental requirements and the local counterpart or extension of such requirements and that the public will benefit from incentives to identify and remedy environmental compliance issues. The Legislature further declares that it is in the public interest to encourage such activities by assuring limited protection of environmental audit findings and of providing fair treatment of those who report environmental audit findings to regulatory authorities.

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 1.